Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-107B of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby re-created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the State Auditor and Inspector to be designated the
"Special Investigative Unit Auditing Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the State Auditor and
Inspector from funds withheld from a municipality's allocations of
gasoline taxes as provided in Section 17-107 of Title 11 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, all monies received from legislative
Req. No. 13176 Page 1

appr opriations for the purpose of conducting investigative municipal
audits, and all monies that remain in the Special Investigative Unit
Auditing Revolving Fund created under Section 17-107A of Title 11 of
the Oklahoma Statutes. All monies accruing to the credit of such
fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
State Auditor and Inspector for the purpose of offsetting expenses
incurred from special investigative audit activities relating to
municipal government. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-13176 JM 03/05/25






Req. No. 13176 Page 2